District of Columbia statutes.
16-3108

Ordering investment of funds; revocation of letters for noncompliance.

The Probate Court may order a personal representative, special administrator, or guardian, whom it has appointed, to bring into court or invest in securities, to be approved by the court, any funds received by the personal representative, special administrator, or guardian. If the party does not, within a reasonable time, to be fixed by the court, comply with the order, the court may revoke his letters.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 600, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
Sept. 6, 1980, D.C. Law 3-85, § 5(b), 27 DCR 2900

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-3108.
1973 Ed., § 16-3108.